Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5457.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "hyperbaric oxygen therapy fund act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (b) "Fund" means the hyperbaric oxygen therapy fund created in section 3. (c) "Grant program" means the hyperbaric oxygen therapy grant program created in section 3 of the hyperbaric oxygen therapy pilot program act. (d) "Pilot program" means the hyperbaric oxygen therapy pilot program established under section 5 of the hyperbaric oxygen therapy pilot program act. Sec. 3. (1) The hyperbaric oxygen therapy fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The department shall expend money from the fund on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Providing grants under the grant program. (b) Establishing and operating the pilot program. (5) After the pilot program ends, the hyperbaric oxygen therapy fund must be closed and any money remaining in the fund lapses to the general fund. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5456 (request no. H00115'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.